Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Gasohol Production

247.900.
Legislative purpose.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that Kentucky farmers who are producers of grain which may be fermented to produce ethanol to be mixed with gasoline to make the fuel known as gasohol shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly and in cooperation with all producers, handlers, dealers, and processors of grain in promoting and stimulating, by research, market development, and education, the increased production, use and sale, domestic and foreign, of grain for the aforementioned purpose of gasohol production.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 210, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

247.910.
Definitions.

For purposes of KRS

247.900

to

247.920

:

“Alcohol production facility” shall mean and include any property or any facility which is not fueled by petroleum but fueled by Kentucky coal, or in the process of converting to the use of coal with the completion date to be in two (2) years or less, and designed, installed, or constructed as a component part of any commercial or industrial premises for the primary purpose of producing ethanol derived from agricultural products or by-products for use as a motor fuel;

“Gasohol” means a fuel containing a mixture of gasoline and at least ten percent (10%) ethanol which is at least one hundred ninety-eight (198) proof for use in motor vehicles;

“Alcohol production tax exemption certificate” shall mean that certificate issued by the Department of Revenue pursuant to KRS

247.920

; and

“Ethanol” means ethyl alcohol produced from grain or other agricultural products or by-products for use as a motor fuel.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 210, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 331, § 40, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 325, § 33, effective July 13, 1990; 2005, ch. 85, § 662, effective June 20, 2005.

247.920.
Alcohol production exemption certificate.

Application for an alcohol production exemption certificate shall be filed with the Department of Revenue in such manner and in such form as may be prescribed by regulations issued by the Department of Revenue and shall contain plans and specifications of the structure or structures, including all materials incorporated and to be incorporated therein and a descriptive list of all equipment acquired or to be acquired by the applicant for the purpose of producing ethanol for fuel use, and any additional information deemed necessary by the Department of Revenue for the proper administration of KRS

247.910

and this section. The Office of Energy Policy shall provide technical assistance and factual information as requested in writing by the Department of Revenue. If the Department of Revenue finds that the facility qualifies as an alcohol production facility as defined by KRS

247.910

, it shall enter a finding and issue a certificate to that effect. The effective date of the certificate shall be the date of issuance of the certificate.

Before issuing an alcohol production tax exemption certificate, the Department of Revenue shall give notice in writing by mail to the Office of Energy Policy, and shall afford to the applicant and to the Office of Energy Policy an opportunity for a hearing. On like notice and opportunity for a hearing, the Department of Revenue shall on its own initiative revoke the certificate when any of the following appears:

The certificate was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation;

The holder of the certificate has failed substantially to proceed with the construction, reconstruction, installation, or acquisition of the alcohol production facilities; or

The structure or equipment or both to which the certificate relates has ceased to be used for the primary purpose of alcohol production for fuel use and is being used for a different purpose.

If the circumstances so require, the Department of Revenue, in lieu of revoking the certificate, may modify it.

On mailing of notice of the action of the Department of Revenue revoking or modifying a certificate as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the certificate shall cease to be in force or shall remain in force only as modified as the case may require.

An alcohol production tax exemption certificate, when issued, shall be sent by certified mail to the applicant and the notice of issuance in the form of certified copies thereof shall be sent to the Office of Energy Policy. Notice of an order of the Department of Revenue denying, revoking, or modifying a certificate in the form of certified copies thereof shall be sent by certified mail to the applicant or the holder and shall be sent to the Office of Energy Policy. The applicant or holder and the Office of Energy Policy shall be deemed parties for the purpose of the review afforded by subsection (6) of this section.

Any party aggrieved by the issuance, refusal to issue, revocation, or modification of an alcohol production tax exemption certificate may appeal from the final ruling of the Department of Revenue to the Board of Tax Appeals pursuant to KRS

49.220

.

In the event of the sale, lease, or other transfer of an alcohol production facility, not involving a different location or use, the holder of an alcohol production tax exemption certificate for the facility may transfer the certificate by written instrument to the person who, except for the transfer of the certificate, would be obligated to pay taxes on the facility. The transferee shall become the holder of the certificate and shall have all rights pertaining thereto, effective as of the date of transfer of the certificate. The transferee shall give written notice of the effective date of the transfer, together with a copy of the instrument of transfer to the Office of Energy Policy and the Department of Revenue.

In the event an alcohol production facility for which an exemption certificate is held ceases to be used for the primary purpose of alcohol production for fuel use or is used for a different purpose other than that for which the exemption certificate was granted, the holder of the certificate shall give written notice by certified mail of the change to the Office of Energy Policy and to the Department of Revenue.

The alcohol production facility exemption certificate, upon approval, shall exempt said facilities from taxes outlined in the provisions of KRS

247.910

and this section and included in KRS Chapters 132, 136, 138, and 139. Each exemption certificate shall remain in force for a period of eight (8) years from the date of issuance and at the end of said period shall lapse. Any alcohol production facility previously exempted under the terms of KRS

247.910

and this section shall not be eligible for recertification upon completion of the eight (8) year certificate period.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 210, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 331, § 41, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 325, § 34, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 277, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 2, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 663, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 152, § 10, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 601, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 74, § 97, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 29, § 63, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 86, effective June 29, 2021.